en: Calf tongue
bg: Телешки език
es: Lengua de ternera
fr: Langue de veau
hr: Teleći jezik
it: Lingua di vitello

en: Cooked calf tongue
fr: Langue de veau cuite

en: Veal loin
fr: Carré de veau

en: Sautéed veal loin, Pan-fried veal loin
fr: Carré de veau sauté, Carré de veau poêlé

en: Veal shoulder
bg: Телешка плешка
fr: Epaule de veau
hr: Teleća lopatica

en: Grilled veal shoulder, Pan-fried veal shoulder
fr: Epaule de veau grillée, Epaule de veau poêlée

en: Braised veal shoulder, Boiled veal shoulder
fr: Epaule de veau braisée, Epaule de veau bouillie

en: Frozen veal shoulder
fr: Epaule de veau surgelée

en: Calf foot
fr: Pied de veau

en: Veal tenderloins
fr: Noix de veau

en: Grilled veal tenderloin, Pan-fried veal tenderloin
fr: Noix de veau grillée, Noix de veau poêlée

en: Roasted veal tenderloin
fr: Noix de veau rôtie

en: Veal escalopes
fr: Escalopes de veau

en: Cooked veal escalopes
fr: Escalopes de veau cuites

en: Veal fillets
bg: Телешко филе
fr: Filets de veau
hr: Teleći fileti

en: Frozen veal fillets
fr: Filets de veau surgelés

en: Roasted veal fillet, Baked veal fillet
fr: Filets de veau rôtis, Filets de veau cuits au four

en: Veal breast
bg: Телешки гърди
fr: Poitrine de veau
hr: Teleća prsa

en: Veal heart
bg: Телешко сърце
fr: Coeur de veau
hr: Teleće srce

en: Olive veal, Veal paupiette
fr: Paupiette de veau